Washington statutes.
RCW 35.71.120

Contracts with mall organization for administration—Conflicting charter provisions.

If the corporate authority desires to have the mall administered by a mall organization rather than by one of its departments, the corporate authority may execute a contract with such an organization for the administration of the mall upon mutually satisfactory terms and conditions: PROVIDED, That if any provision of a city charter conflicts with this section, such provision of the city charter shall prevail.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.71.120. Prior: 1961 c 111 s 12.]